Nebraska, session 109, LB752.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB752 LB752
2026 2026
Section 1. It is the intent of the Legislature to implement a net
reduction of five million two hundred thousand dollars of General Funds
for fiscal year 2026-27 for the Department of Correctional Services to
Program 200, Operations, from the McCook Detention Facility.
It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of
Correctional Services use five million dollars of General Funds for
fiscal year 2026-27 for tuition, fees, and other direct costs for reentry
and reintegration programming for committed offenders.
-2-